Utah statutes.
46-1-12.   Fees and notice.

(1)  The maximum fees that may be charged by a notary for notarial acts are for:

(a)  acknowledgments, $5 per signature;

(b)  certified copies, $5 per page certified;

(c)  jurats, $5 per signature; and

(d)  oaths or affirmations without a signature, $5 per person.

(2)  A notary may charge a travel fee, not to exceed the approved federal mileage rate, when traveling to perform a notarial act if:

(a)  the notary explains to the person requesting the notarial act that the travel fee is separate from the notarial fee in Subsection (1) and is neither specified nor mandated by law; and

(b)  the notary and the person requesting the notarial act agree upon the travel fee in advance.

(3)  A notary shall display an English-language schedule of fees for notarial acts and may display a nonEnglish-language schedule of fees.

(4) (a)  The fee of a notary shall not exceed $5 per individual for each set of forms relating to a change of that individual's immigration status.

(b)  The fee limitation in Subsection (4)(a) shall apply whether or not the notary is acting as a notary but does not apply to a licensed attorney, who is also a notary rendering professional services regarding immigration matters.



Amended by Chapter 287, 1998 General Session

